Illinois, session 104th, HB1931.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Insurance Law of the Civil 5Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by changing Section 61405-25 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 1405/1405-25)8    Sec. 1405-25. Uninsured Ombudsman Program. 9    (a) The Department of Insurance shall establish and 10operate an Ombudsman Program for uninsured individuals to 11provide assistance and education to those individuals 12regarding health insurance benefits options and rights under 13State and federal law. The program may include, but is not 14limited to, counseling for uninsured individuals in the 15discovery, evaluation, and comparison of options for obtaining 16health insurance coverage.17    (b) The Department may recruit and train volunteers to 18assist in the Ombudsman Program. The volunteers may provide 19one-on-one counseling on health insurance availability matters 20and provide education to uninsured individuals through public 21forums.22    (c) The Department may issue reasonable rules necessary to 23implement this Section.  HB1931- 2 -LRB104 09305 JRC 19363 b1    (d) The Department shall conduct a study to better 2understand the gaps in health insurance coverage for uninsured 3residents in Illinois. The study shall look at reasons why an 4individual is uninsured, such as a part-time or full-time 5working status, the inability to afford coverage, and the 6inability to qualify for coverage under the medical assistance 7program established under Article V of the Illinois Public Aid 8Code. The study shall additionally look at those residents in 9Illinois who are insured and whether they are covered through 10an employer-sponsored plan or through the Illinois health 11insurance marketplace. The Department shall submit a report of 12the findings, as well as the Department's recommendations to 13reduce the number of uninsured residents in Illinois, to the 14General Assembly no later than 12 months after the effective 15date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly. 16(Source: P.A. 92-331, eff. 1-1-02.) 17    Section 10. The University of Illinois Hospital Act is 18amended by adding Section 3.5 as follows: 19    (110 ILCS 330/3.5 new)20    Sec. 3.5. University of Illinois Hospital workforce; 21health insurance required. Notwithstanding any other provision 22of law, the University of Illinois Hospital shall provide 23health insurance coverage to all of its workforce.   HB1931- 3 -LRB104 09305 JRC 19363 b1    Section 15. The Hospital Licensing Act is amended by 2adding Section 10.5 as follows: 3    (210 ILCS 85/10.5 new)4    Sec. 10.5. Hospital workforce; health insurance required. 5Notwithstanding any other provision of law, each hospital 6licensed under this Act shall provide health insurance 7coverage to all of its workforce.